District of Columbia statutes.
22-3751.01

Enhanced penalties for offenses committed against transit operators and Metrorail station managers.

(a)

Any person who commits an offense enumerated in § 22-3752 against a transit operator, who, at the time of the offense, is authorized to operate and is operating a mass transit vehicle in the District of Columbia, or against Metrorail station manager while on duty in the District of Columbia, may be punished by a fine of up to one and 1/2 times the maximum fine otherwise authorized for the offense and may be imprisoned for a term of up to one and 1/2 times the maximum term of imprisonment otherwise authorized by the offense, or both.

(b)

For the purposes of this section, the term:

(1)

“Mass transit vehicle” means any publicly or privately owned or operated commercial vehicle for the carriage of 6 or more passengers, including any Metrobus, Metrorail, Metroaccess, or DC Circulator vehicle or other bus, trolley, or van operating within the District of Columbia.

(2)

“Metrorail station manager” means any Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority employee who is assigned to supervise a Metrorail station from a kiosk at that station.

(3)

“Transit operator” means a person who is licensed to operate a mass transit vehicle.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-307, § 2a
as added July 23, 2008, D.C. Law 17-206, § 2(b), 55 DCR 5168

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-3752 and § 35-261.